California statutes. Public Resources Code
(D) A report on implementation of the Compost Market Program pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 42230) of Part 3.

(E) A report on the progress in developing and implementing the comprehensive Market Development Plan, pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 42005) of Chapter 1 of Part 3.

(F) The number of retreaded tires purchased by the Department of General Services during the prior fiscal year pursuant to Section 42414.

(G) The results of the study performed in consultation with the Department of General Services pursuant to Section 42415 to determine if tire retreads, procured by the Department of General Services, have met all quality and performance criteria of a new tire, including any recommendations to expand, revise, or curtail the program.

(H) The number of recycled lead-acid batteries purchased during the prior fiscal year by the Department of General Services pursuant to Section 42443.

(I) A list of established price preferences for recycled paper products for the prior fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c)
 of Section 12162 of the Public Contract Code.

(J) A report on the implementation of the white office paper recovery program pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 42560) of Part 3.

(5) Pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), both of the following information:

(A) A report on the annual audit of the used oil recycling program established pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 48600) of Part 7.

(B) A summary of industrial and lubricating oil sales and recycling rates, the results of programs funded pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 48600) of Part 7, recommendations, if any, for statutory changes to the program, including changes in the amounts of the payment required by Section 48650 and the recycling incentive, and
 plans for present and future programs to be conducted over the next two years.

(6) Pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), all of the following information:

(A) The development by the
 department of the model countywide or regional siting element and model countywide or regional agency integrated waste management plan pursuant to Section 40912, including its effectiveness in assisting local agencies.

(B) The adoption by the department of a program to provide assistance to cities, counties, or regional agencies in the development and implementation of source reduction programs pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 40912.

(C) The development by the
 department of model programs and materials to assist rural counties and cities in preparing city and county source reduction and recycling elements pursuant to Section 41787.3.

(D) A report on the number of tires that are recycled or otherwise diverted from disposal in landfills or stockpiles.

(E) A report on the development and implementation of recommendations, with proposed implementing regulations, for providing technical assistance to counties and cities that meet criteria specified in Section 41782, so that those counties and cities will be able to meet the objectives of this division. The recommendations shall, among other things, address both of the following matters:

(i) Assistance in developing methods of raising revenue at the local level to fund rural integrated
 waste management programs.

(ii) Assistance in developing alternative methods of source reduction, recycling, and composting of solid waste suitable for rural local governments.

(F) A report on the status and implementation of the “Buy Recycled” program established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42600, including the waste collection and recycling programs established pursuant to Sections 12164.5 and 12165 of the Public Contract Code.

(7) Pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b), a description of sites cleaned up under the Solid Waste Disposal and Codisposal Site Cleanup Program established pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48020) of Chapter 2 of Part 7, a description of remaining sites where there is no responsible party or the responsible party is unable or unwilling to pay for cleanup, and
 recommendations for any needed legislative changes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   (AB 1594)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

40507.1.

(a) As part of the annual report required to be submitted by the board to the Legislature pursuant to Section 40507 on or before March 1, 2003, the board shall include a report on new and emerging conversion technologies, including, but not limited to, noncombustion thermal technologies, including gasification and pyrolysis, chemical technologies such as acid hydrolysis or distillation, and biological technologies, other than composting, such as enzyme hydrolysis. The board shall only evaluate those conversion technologies that provide demonstrated environmental benefits over the transformation and disposal of solid waste.

(b) The report required by subdivision (a) shall contain all of the following:

(1) Specific and discrete definitions and descriptions of each conversion technology evaluated.

(2) A description and evaluation of the life-cycle environmental and public health impacts of each conversion technology in comparison to those environmental and public health impacts from the transformation and disposal of solid waste.

(3) A description and evaluation of the technical performance characteristics, feedstocks, emissions, and residues used by each conversion technology and identification of the cleanest, least polluting conversion technologies.

(4) A description and evaluation of the impacts on the recycling and composting markets as a result of each conversion technology.

(c) The board shall require that the report be subject to an external scientific peer review process conducted pursuant to Section 57004 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The board shall consult with the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission and other state, federal, or international governmental agencies in preparing the report required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 740, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

40508.

The board is designated as the state solid waste management agency for all purposes stated in the Federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.) and any other federal act heretofore or hereafter enacted affecting solid waste.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

40509.

The board may render technical assistance and make recommendations concerning potential solid waste disposal sites upon the request of the board of supervisors of any county. The board may request any state agency to assist the board in rendering technical assistance and making recommendations pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

40510.

The board shall use a rollcall vote for all official board decisions, including, but not limited to, approval, denial, or amendment of integrated waste management plans, exemptions, time extensions, approval, denial, and amendment of any permits issued pursuant to a vote of the board and other appropriate decisions. The rollcall votes shall be included in the minutes of the board’s meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

40511.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 7550.5 of the Government Code, on or before December 1, 2000, the board, in consultation with the Department of Conservation, shall prepare and submit to the Legislature a report that identifies any duplication or overlap between the following programs authorized under this division and Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500) administered and funded by the two agencies:

(1) Public information and education programs.

(2) Local government review and assistance programs.

(3) Recycled materials market development programs.

(b) The report shall include, but not be limited to, suggested legislation, budget actions, or administrative actions that could be taken to eliminate duplication or overlap between the two agencies and programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 815, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40512.

(a) The department shall establish a pilot project located in the Counties of Los Angeles and Ventura in partnership with garment manufacturers in order to study and report on the feasibility of recycling fabric.

(b) The pilot project shall not exceed three years and shall conclude no later than January 1, 2027.

(c) The pilot project, which shall be submitted by an applicant jurisdiction, shall be designed to create a circular economy for the highest and best use of waste textiles, including, but not limited to, creating cleaner and more uniform material streams, creating safe and living-wage jobs for local workers, educating the public, and reducing the disposal of textiles in
 California. The pilot project may include, but is not limited to, the following project elements:

(1) Creating accessible textile collection sites.

(2) Developing a hub for consolidating preconsumer textile scraps to facilitate the use of those materials by other businesses.

(3) Remanufacturing of fibers.

(4) Increasing capacity to sort textiles to create cleaner and more uniform material streams, either manually or through investment in machinery and permanent infrastructure development.

(5) Community engagement and education on impacts of and alternatives to “fast fashion,” which may include, but is not limited to, conducting mending workshops in the community.

(d) The operator of the pilot project shall annually report to the department demonstrating the pilot project’s progress toward meeting the goals of the project identified in subdivision (a). The report shall specify the amount, in pounds, of textiles that were collected and that were diverted from disposal in the prior year of the pilot project.

(e) The department shall post the report required pursuant to subdivision (a) on its internet website within six months of the conclusion of the pilot project, and in no instance later than July 1, 2027.

(f) Any state funding provided for the pilot project is subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of
 that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 616, Sec. 1.   (SB 1187)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Debris Cleanup and Removal [40520. - 40520.]

40520.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Contract” means a contract between the department and a contractor to perform wildfire debris cleanup and removal.

(2) “The department” means either the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery or another state agency tasked to manage contracts for wildfire debris cleanup and removal by the Office of Emergency Services, within the office of the Governor, in accordance with the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code). 

(b) (1) The department shall prequalify contractors to
 enter into contracts in communities impacted by wildfires. These contracts may be entered into before the onset of major damage in order to retain the contractor in readiness to respond to incidents as needed. Work performed under a contract entered into pursuant to this section shall be limited to preparation, removal, transport, and recycling or disposal of metals, ash, debris, concrete foundations and flatwork, potentially dangerous trees, and contaminated soil on residential and public properties included in the structural debris removal function.

(2) The department shall require any contractor seeking to enter into a contract before the onset of major damage to obtain and submit to the department a standard form of questionnaire and financial statement, including a complete statement of the bidder’s financial ability and experience in performing the preparation, removal, transport, and recycling or disposal of metals, ash, debris, concrete
 foundations and flatwork, potentially dangerous trees, and contaminated soil on residential and public properties. The bidder shall verify the questionnaire and financial statement under oath in the manner in which pleadings in civil actions are verified.

(c) The department shall not award a contract to any bidder for the performance of any portion of a wildfire debris cleanup and removal project, unless the bidder meets the following requirements:

(1) The prime contractor has a valid general engineering contractor license pursuant to the Contractors State License Law (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code) with a state hazardous substance removal certification as described in Section 7058.7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) The prime contractor is
 registered with the Department of Industrial Relations and qualified to bid pursuant to Sections 1725.5 and 1771.1 of the Labor Code.

(3) The prime contractor provides enforceable commitments to do both of the following:

(A) Use a skilled and trained workforce to perform work under the contract, consistent with federal reimbursement requirements, which falls within an apprenticeable occupation pursuant to Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, for itself and its subcontractors.

(B) Pay prevailing wages and request the dispatch of apprentices, in accordance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, for itself and its subcontractors.

(4) The prime
 contractor demonstrates the existence of, for itself and its subcontractors at every tier, an agreement with a registered apprenticeship program, approved by the California Apprenticeship Council, that has graduated apprentices in each of the preceding five years.

(5) The prime contractor will self-perform at least 30 percent of the labor hours provided under the contract, as demonstrated by its certified payroll.

(6) The prime contractor’s experience modification rate, within the state, for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category, or if the contractor is a party to an alternative dispute resolution system in accordance with Section 3201.5 of the Labor
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.   (SB 978)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. INTEGRATED WASTE MANAGEMENT PLANS [40900. - 41956.]



  CHAPTER 1. Plan Preparation [40900. - 40977.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings [40900. - 40901.]

40900.

(a) The Legislature finds that integrated waste management plans prepared and adopted by local agencies shall conform, to the maximum extent possible to the policies and goals established under Article 1 (commencing with Section 40000) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 40050) of Chapter 1 of Part 1.

(b) The Legislature finds that decisions involving the establishment or expansion of solid waste facilities should be guided by an effective planning process, including meaningful public and private solid waste industry participation.

(c) The Legislature declares that it is the policy of the state and the intent of the Legislature that each state, regional, and local agency concerned with the solid waste facility planning and siting process involve the public through public hearings and informative meetings and that, at those hearings and other public forums, the public be granted the opportunity to respond to clearly defined alternative objectives, policies, and actions.

(d) The Legislature further declares that it is the policy of the state and the intent of the Legislature to foster and encourage private solid waste enterprises. In furtherance of that policy, it is the intent of the Legislature that each state, regional, and local agency concerned with the solid waste facility planning and siting process involve the private solid waste industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1355, Sec. 11.   Effective September 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

40900.1.

The Legislature hereby further finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is important to encourage state agencies to plan and implement programs that will reduce the amount of solid waste going to disposal facilities through source reduction, recycling, and composting.

(b) Local agencies, other than a host jurisdiction, and federal agencies should be encouraged to plan and implement programs that will reduce the amount of solid waste going to disposal facilities through source reduction, recycling, and composting.

(c) Each state agency shall, to the extent feasible and within existing budgetary constraints, develop and implement source reduction, recycling, and composting programs that will reduce the amount of solid waste going to disposal facilities. Those programs shall be consistent with Executive Order W-7-91, which ordered state agencies to establish recycling programs, reduce paper waste, purchase recycled products, and implement measures that minimize the generation of waste.

(d) Local, state, and federal agencies generating solid waste that is sent to a host jurisdiction for disposal should be encouraged to provide the host jurisdiction with information on the amount of solid waste and regarding any solid waste source reduction, recycling, or composting programs that have been implemented by the agency, to assist the host jurisdiction in developing and implementing the planning requirements of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 672, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

40901.

(a) The following shall apply with regard to the preparation, revision, and implementation of source reduction and recycling elements pursuant to this part:

(1) To determine solid waste amounts in the base year and in the first locally adopted source reduction and recycling element, cities, counties, and regional agencies shall quantify all solid waste generated. For the purposes of this requirement, solid waste generated is equal to existing disposal plus existing diversion, unless modification to these amounts is required pursuant to Section 41801.5.

(2) To determine solid waste amounts in subsequent elements, and for the purposes of determining whether the diversion requirements of Section 41780 have been met, cities, counties, and regional agencies shall report the amounts of solid waste disposed of at permitted disposal facilities. For these purposes, cities, counties, and regional agencies are not required to quantify the amounts of solid waste which have been diverted from disposal through recycling or composting, except for diversion which results from recycling and composting programs which are operated or funded by cities, counties, or regional agencies.

(3) For revisions of the documents specified in Sections 41032, 41033, 41050, 41070, 41072, 41200, 41260, 41350, 41352, 41370, 41372, 41400, 41402, and 41460, cities, counties, and regional agencies shall follow the procedures identified in paragraph (2).

(b) Cities and counties which choose to form a regional agency shall not be required to revise source reduction and recycling elements which were complete at the time of the formation of the regional agency. Any revisions which are needed to reflect program and other changes caused by the formation of a regional agency shall be reflected in the revised source reduction and recycling element submitted by the regional agency at the time of the five-year revision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Board Assistance in Local Planning [40910. - 40913.]

40910.

The board shall establish, on or before January 1, 1994, an office of local government assistance. The office shall, to the maximum extent feasible, utilizing existing resources, assist local agencies in the preparation, modification, and implementation of integrated waste management plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40911.

In adopting or amending regulations pursuant to this part, the board shall take into account all of the following:

(a) The shared responsibility that exists between the board and local agencies for activities such as the development of markets for materials diverted from disposal facilities, public education and information, and source reduction.

(b) The importance of promoting regional cooperation among local agencies and cooperation among local agencies and the board in achieving the objectives of this division, to the extent that this cooperation will result in more cost-effective and efficient implementation of this division.

(c) The need for local agencies to receive assistance from the board in preparing and implementing integrated waste management plans and the elements of those plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40912.

(a) The board shall develop a model countywide or regional siting element and a model countywide or regional agency integrated waste management plan that will establish prototypes of the content and format that counties or regional agencies may use in meeting the requirements of this part.

(b) On or before July 1, 2001, the board shall develop a model revised source reduction and recycling element that will establish prototypes of the content and format of that element that cities, counties, regional agencies, or a city and county may use in meeting the requirements of this part.

(c) The board shall adopt a program to provide assistance to cities, counties, regional agencies, or a city and county in the development and implementation of source reduction programs. The program shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The development of model source reduction programs and strategies that may be used at the local and regional level.

(2) Ongoing analysis of public and private sector source reduction programs that may be provided to cities, counties, regional agencies, and a city and county in order to assist them in complying with Article 3 (commencing with Section 41050) of Chapter 2 and Article 3 (commencing with Section 41350) of Chapter 3.

(3) Assistance to cities, counties, regional agencies, and a city and county in the development of source reduction programs for commercial and industrial generators of solid waste that include the development of source reduction strategies designed for specific types of commercial and industrial generators. 

(d) The board shall, to the maximum extent feasible, utilizing existing resources, provide local jurisdictions and private businesses with information, tools, and mathematical models to assist with meeting or exceeding the 50-percent diversion requirement pursuant to Section 41780. The board shall act as a solid waste information clearinghouse.

(e) (1) On or before April 1, 2003, and using existing resources, the board shall provide local jurisdictions and private businesses with information and models to assist with consideration of environmental justice concerns when complying with Section 41701.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “environmental justice” has the meaning defined in subdivision (e) of Section 65040.12 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1003, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

40913.

(a) On or before January 1, 1994, the board shall develop and implement a program to assist local agencies in the identification of markets for materials that are diverted from disposal facilities through source reduction, recycling, and composting.

(b) The program shall provide information to local agencies on individual purchasers of diverted materials and on potential and actual local, regional, and statewide marketing opportunities for materials that are diverted from disposal facilities. The program also shall provide local agencies with information on programs implemented by the board and by other agencies of state government to assist in the development, maintenance, and enhancement of markets for materials that are diverted from disposal facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Local Task Forces [40950. - 40950.]

40950.

(a) On or before March 1, 1990, and every five years thereafter, each county, which is not a city and county, shall convene a task force to assist in coordinating the development of city source reduction and recycling elements prepared pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 41000), the county source reduction and recycling element prepared pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 41300), and to assist in the preparation of the countywide siting element prepared pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 41700).

(b) The membership of the task force shall be determined by the county and by a majority of the cities within the county which contain a majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county, except in those counties which have only two cities, in which case the membership of the task force is subject to approval of the city which contains the majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county. The task force may include representatives of the solid waste industry, environmental organizations, the general public, special districts, and affected governmental agencies.

(c) To ensure a coordinated and cost-effective regional recycling system, the task force shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify solid waste management issues of countywide or regional concern. 

(2) Determine the need for solid waste collection and transfer systems, processing facilities, and marketing strategies that can serve more than one local jurisdiction within the region.

(3) Facilitate the development of multijurisdictional arrangements for the marketing of recyclable materials.

(4) To the extent possible, facilitate resolution of conflicts and inconsistencies between or among city and county source reduction and recycling elements.

(d) The task force shall develop goals, policies, and procedures which are consistent with guidelines and regulations adopted by the board, to guide the development of the siting element of the countywide integrated waste management plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regional Agencies [40970. - 40977.]

40970.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to authorize cities and counties to form regional agencies to implement this part in order to reduce the cost of reporting and tracking of disposal and diversion programs by individual cities and counties and to increase the diversion of solid waste from disposal facilities. It is further the intent of the Legislature that this part be binding upon, and enforceable against, the individual cities and counties which are member agencies of the regional agency. It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to diminish the responsibility of individual cities and counties to implement source reduction, recycling, and composting programs as required by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40971.

A city or county may form a regional agency with another city or county for the purpose of complying with this part. Formation of the regional agency is voluntary and, except as provided under Section 40975, shall be subject to the terms and conditions set out in the agreement pursuant to which the regional agency is formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40972.

This part is binding upon, and enforceable against, the individual cities and counties which are member agencies of the regional agency. However, an agreement adopted pursuant to this article may apportion responsibilities for the implementation of this part among the cities and counties which are member agencies of the regional agency. Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit a city or county which is a member agency of a regional agency from preparing and submitting to the board for review and approval a source reduction and recycling element or household hazardous waste element.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40973.

(a) The regional agency, and not the cities or counties that are member agencies of the regional agency, may be responsible for compliance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 41780) of Chapter 6 if specified in the agreement pursuant to which the regional agency is formed.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 41782, except as provided in subdivision (c), if a regional agency has been specified in the regional agency formation agreement as the responsible party for compliance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 41780) of Chapter 6 of Part 1, neither the regional agency nor any member jurisdiction of the regional agency shall be eligible for a reduction of the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(c) The regional agency may be eligible for a reduction of diversion and planning requirements if all member jurisdictions of a regional agency are rural cities or rural counties, as defined, respectively, in Sections 40183 and 40184.

(d) The regional agency may be eligible for a reduction of planning requirements if all member jurisdictions of a regional agency are cities located in both a rural area and a rural county, as defined in Section 40184, and an unincorporated portion of a county.

(e) (1) If, pursuant to subdivision (a), a regional agency is specified in the regional agency formation agreement as the responsible party for compliance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 41780) of Chapter 6, the regional agency shall not be comprised of more than two counties and all of the cities within those two counties, except as otherwise authorized by the board.

(2) The board may authorize the formation of a regional agency that exceeds two counties and all of the cities within those two counties, for purposes of compliance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 41780) of Chapter 6, if the board finds that the formation of the regional agency will not adversely affect compliance with this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 600, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40974.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 40972, each city or county that is a member agency of a regional agency is liable for any civil penalties that may be imposed by the board pursuant to Section 41813 or 41850. However, an agreement that establishes a regional agency may apportion any civil penalties between or among the cities or counties that are member agencies of the regional agency. The total amount of civil penalties that may be imposed against the regional agency is equivalent to that amount that is the sum of the penalties that may be imposed against each city or county that is a member agency of the regional agency.

(b) (1) An agreement may provide that a city or county is subject to the portion of a penalty imposed upon a regional agency pursuant to Section 41850 that is in proportion to the city’s or county’s responsibility for failure to implement a source reduction and recycling element or household hazardous waste element, as determined by the regional agency.

(2) If an agreement provides for apportioning a penalty pursuant to paragraph (1), the regional agency shall provide the city or county with a written notice regarding the city’s or county’s responsibility, including the basis for determining the city’s or county’s proportional responsibility, and an opportunity for a hearing before the regional agency’s governing body, before assessing the city or county a proportion of the penalty imposed by the board.

(3) This subdivision does not affect the authority of the board to impose a penalty pursuant to other provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 359, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

40975.

(a) Any agreement forming a regional agency shall be submitted to the board for review and approval at the time the regional agency integrated waste management plan is submitted to the board for review and approval.

(b) Any agreement forming a regional agency shall, at minimum, contain all of the following provisions:

(1) A listing of the cities and counties which are member agencies of the regional agency, and a description of the regional agency, including the name and address of the regional agency.

(2) Consistent with Section 40974, a description of the method by which any civil penalties imposed by the board pursuant to Sections 41813 and 41850 will be allocated among the cities or counties which are member agencies of the regional agency.

(3) A contingency plan which shows how each city or county which is a member agency of the regional agency will comply with the requirements of this part, including, but not limited to, Article 1 (commencing with Section 41780) of Chapter 6, in the event that the regional agency is abolished.

(4) A description of the duties and responsibilities of each city or county which is a member agency of the regional agency which demonstrates that the city or county will comply with Article 1 (commencing with Section 41780) of Chapter 6.

(5) A description of source reduction, recycling, and composting programs to be implemented by the regional agency. Those programs shall be at least as comprehensive and effective in meeting the requirements of Article 1 (commencing with Section 41780) of Chapter 6 as those which each city or county which is a member agency of the regional agency has proposed in its source reduction and recycling element.

(6) Any other additional element as determined to be needed by the cities or counties which are member agencies of the regional agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40976.

A city, county, or regional agency may enter into a memorandum of understanding with another city, county, regional agency, agency formed under a joint exercise of powers agreement, or district established to manage solid waste for the purpose of preparing and implementing source reduction and recycling elements, household hazardous waste elements, or a countywide or regional agency integrated waste management plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1169, Sec. 5.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

40977.

A regional agency may authorize one district, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 41821.2, to be included as a member of the regional agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 740, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. City Source Reduction and Recycling Elements [41000. - 41260.]



  ARTICLE 1. Requirements [41000. - 41003.]

41000.

(a) On or before July 1, 1992, each city shall prepare, adopt, and, excepting a city and county, submit to the county in which the city is located a source reduction and recycling element which includes all of the components specified in this chapter and which complies with the requirements specified in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 41780).

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a city determines that it is unable to comply with the deadline established under subdivision (a) and unable to comply with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000), to the extent that division requires the preparation and certification of an environmental impact report for the element, the city shall do all of the following:

(1) On or before July 1, 1992, the city shall adopt a resolution stating the reasons it is unable to comply with the deadline established under subdivision (a) and to complete and certify the environmental impact report for the element. The resolution shall also state a date when the city will comply with the deadline established under subdivision (a) and complete and certify the environmental impact report for the element.

(2) On or before July 1, 1992, the city shall submit its draft source reduction and recycling element and a copy of the resolution adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) to the county within which the city is located.

(3) Upon completion and certification of the environmental impact report for the source reduction and recycling element, or December 1, 1992, whichever is sooner, the city shall submit its final source reduction and recycling element to the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

41001.

The city source reduction and recycling element shall include a program for management of solid waste generated within the city, consistent with the waste management hierarchy provided in Section 40051.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41002.

The city source reduction and recycling element shall place primary emphasis on implementation of all feasible source reduction, recycling, and composting programs while identifying the amount of landfill and transformation capacity that will be needed for solid waste which cannot be reduced at the source, recycled, or composted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41003.

Each city source reduction and recycling element shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following components for solid waste generated in the jurisdiction of the plan:

(a) A waste characterization component.

(b) A source reduction component.

(c) A recycling component.

(d) A composting component.

(e) A solid waste facility capacity component.

(f) An education and public information component.

(g) A funding component.

(h) A special waste component.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1406, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Waste Characterization Component [41030. - 41033.]

41030.
